Massachusetts, session 194th, H1906.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Section 30 of chapter 266 of the General Laws, as amended by Chapter 69
of the Acts of 2018, is hereby amended by inserting at the end of the first paragraph the
following:-
For purpose of this section, multiple violations of either this section or section 30A of this
chapter occurring within a one hundred eighty day period may be aggregated into a single count
with the aggregated value of the property stolen used to determine whether the violation is a
misdemeanor or felony as provided herein.
of 2

SECTION 2: Section 37B of chapter 266 of the General Laws, as amended by Chapter 69
of the Acts of 2018, is hereby amended by inserting at the end of the first paragraph the
following:-
A series of two or more violations of this section occurring within a one hundred and
eighty day period may be aggregated into a single count with the aggregated value of money,
goods, or services obtained used to determine whether the violation is a misdemeanor or felony
as provided herein.
SECTION 3: Section 37C of chapter 266 of the General Laws, as amended by Chapter 69
of the Acts of 2018, is hereby amended by inserting at the end of the first paragraph the
following:-
A series of two or more violations of this section occurring within a one hundred and
eighty day period may be aggregated into a single count with the aggregated value of money,
goods, or services obtained used to determine whether the violation is a misdemeanor or felony
as provided herein.
SECTION 4: Section 60 of chapter 266 of the General Laws, as amended by Chapter 69
of the Acts of 2018, is hereby amended by inserting at the end of the first paragraph the
following:-
A series of two or more violations of this section occurring within a one hundred and
eighty day period may be aggregated into a single count with the aggregated value of property
obtained used to determine whether the violation is a misdemeanor or felony as provided herein.
of 2